Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.200

Collection of sales and use taxes for zoo and aquarium advisory authority.

The county treasurer or, in the case of a home rule county, the county official designated by county charter and ordinance as the official with custody over the collection of countywide tax revenues, shall receive all money representing revenues from taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.400, and shall disburse such money to the authority established in RCW 36.01.190.

[ 1999 c 104 s 2.]